Hawaii statutes.
[§521-77] Investigation and resolution of
complaints by the office of consumer protection. The office of consumer
protection may receive, investigate and attempt to resolve any dispute arising
under this chapter. [L 1976, c 77, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next